Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
There are no additional school districts the Committee considers advisable to be included in the proposed Union High School District.

The Union High School District shall be established for a class grade level from 9 through 12 as well as the Regional Vocational Center.

No new schools are to be constructed.

A. Any transportation of students to and from the Union High School shall be the responsibility of each member district at its own discretion.

B.
The negotiated agreements and individual contracts for Spaulding High School administrators, teachers, aides and custodians shall be honored by the Union High School District until such time as the Union High
School District Board and the staff organizations represented negotiate new agreements for Union High School District employees.

C.
The curriculum to be offered for grades 9 through 12 shall be the current Spaulding High School curriculum with any amendments made by the Barre City School Board before the Union High School District is formed
or by the Union High School Board after the Union High School District is formed.

The Union High School District shall not assume the indebtedness of the proposed member districts.

The Union High School District shall not acquire any properties of the proposed member districts. The Union High School District shall have exclusive use of and responsibility for all property encompassing the present Spaulding High School and Barre Vocational
Center owned by the City of Barre until such time as this Union High School District ceases to exist. All renovations, additions, or free standing capital improvements to the property being used by the Union High School District
shall be funded by the Union High School District and owned by the City of Barre.

The expenses of building, maintaining and operating schools within Spaulding Union High School District #41 shall be divided between Barre City School District and Barre Town School District in the proportion which the average student enrollment in each
district for the three immediately preceding school years bears to the total student enrollment in any given school year, commencing July 1, 1995 and continuing thereafter.

The Union High School District School Board representation shall be on a per capita basis, with 1 member for every 2,500 residents.

Based on population data as of October 1986 the initial representation shall be as follows:

Barre Town — 7,093 = 3 members

Barre City — 9,824 = 4 members

The representation shall be subject to re-apportionment following each decennial census.

Terms of office of the Union High School District School Board members:

A.
One director from Barre Town and two directors from Barre City to be elected to serve until July 1 following the second annual meeting of said District.

B.
One director from Barre Town and one director from Barre City to be elected to serve until July 1 following the third annual meeting of said District.

C.
One director from Barre Town and one director from Barre City to be elected to serve until July 1 following the fourth annual meeting of said District.

Schedule:

July 1, 1988 — 1 Barre Town — 2 Barre City expire

July 1, 1989 — 1 Barre Town — 1 Barre City expire

July 1, 1990 — 1 Barre Town — 1 Barre City expire

The Union High School District proposal shall be submitted to the voters of Barre Town and Barre City on March 3, 1987.

Tuition students from Barre Town who will be juniors or seniors in their present State approved tuition receiving school in 1987-88 may elect to complete their studies and graduate from the school with full tuition being paid by the Barre Town School
District. These students will not be counted in determining the allocation of capital and operating expenses of the Union High School District.

The Union High School shall be known as Spaulding High School.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

2003
St. Albans City and St. Albans Town School Districts voted yes to the following article and final report:

Shall the legal voters of the St. Albans City School District/St. Albans Town School District approve that the St. Albans City School District/ St. Albans Town School District, which the State Board of Education has found necessary to include in the proposed
Union High School District, join with the St. Albans Town School District/St. Albans City School District, which the State Board of Education has found necessary to include in the proposed Union High School District, for
the purpose of forming a Union High School District to make Bellows Free Academy a Union Public High School as provided in Title 16, Vermont Statutes Annotated, upon the following conditions and agreements.

(a)
Class of schools. The Union High School District shall operate and manage a Union High School offering instruction in grades 9 through 12.

(b)
Board of School Directors. There will be three school board members from St. Albans City and two school board members from St. Albans Town serving on the Union High School District Board.

(c)
Apportionment of Expenses. The allocation of allowable capital and operating expenses of the Union High School District will be based on the proportionate average daily membership (ADM), as defined by Vermont
State Statutes, for the preceding years in grades 9 through 12 for St. Albans City and St. Albans Town.

(d)
Assumption of debts and ownership of school property. The Union High School District shall assume the indebtedness of Bellows Free Academy, acquire the school properties of Bellows Free Academy, and pay for
them, all as specified in the final report.

(e)
Final Report. The provisions of the final report approved by the State Board of Education on the 16th day of December 2003, which is on file in the City Clerk’s office, shall govern the Union High School District.

Final Report

1.
The School Districts of St. Albans City and St. Albans Town are necessary to the establishment of the Bellows Free Academy Union High School District.

2.
Many surrounding School Districts were contacted and considered for possible inclusion in the Union High School District. No additional school districts beyond St. Albans City and St. Albans Town are being
recommended at this time as advisable to be included.

3.
The Union High School will offer education to students in grades 9 through 12.

4.
There are no new facilities necessary for the formation of this proposed Union High School District. If approved, the Union High School District will utilize the existing BFA facilities for the purpose of
educating students in grades 9 through 12. During the period of transition, any renovations or maintenance needs will be addressed by the Bellows Free Academy Board of Trustees and will be up to the discretion of that same
board of trustees and subject to available financial resources.

5. a.
During the first year of operations the proposed Union School will provide transportation to only those students with special needs who otherwise would not be able to travel to and from school. No additional
transportation will be provided during this first year to students from either St. Albans City or St. Albans Town. Beyond the first year, decisions regarding transportation of students will be left to the discretion of
the Union High School Board.

b.
The Union High School District will honor all master contracts that are in place at BFA on June 30, 2005. These master agreements will continue until their specified termination date. Subsequent master contracts
will be subject to legal and agreed upon bargaining procedures.

c.
All administrators, teachers and staff, employed by the current private school at the time of the formation of this Union High School will continue in their employment during the first year of operating the
proposed Union High School District. Executing subsequent personnel contracts will be the decision of the Union High School Board. All personnel hired by the Union High School District must meet State of Vermont education
licensing requirements.

d.
The curriculum and education programs currently being offered to students at BFA are considered adequate and desirable. Therefore, the proposed Union School District will, for the first year of operations,
offer the curriculum and education programs that are in place on June 30, 2005. The curriculum and programs offered in the new Union High School District will meet all State and Federal legal requirements.

6.
The Union High School District will assume a current total debt of $5,221,726.00 specific to existing properties of the Bellows Free Academy. The breakdown of debt for the combined principal and interest is
as follows:

• ADA Project (Elevator) = Total $337,983.00

• Hospital Conversion = Total $2,764,965.00

• Collins-Perley Sports Center = $411,289.00

• BFA North Project, Windows & Roof = $1,707,489.00

• The Union High School District will assume any additional debt accumulated during the 2004 and 2005 fiscal years that is necessary to maintain the school and its facilities at its current level as of October 2003.

7.
Following approval by the Franklin Superior Court, the Trustees of Bellows Free Academy will convey to the Union High School District, subject to all encumbrances of record, all of the real estate and personal
property utilized by Bellows Free Academy, including all land and buildings of Bellows Free Academy and the Collins Perley Center.

8.
The allocation of allowable capital and operating expenses of the Union High School District will be based on the proportionate average daily membership (ADM), as defined by Vermont State Statutes, for the
preceding year in grades 9 through 12 for St. Albans City and St. Albans Town.

9.
Membership on the Union High School Board will be apportioned based on the combined population of both St. Albans City and St. Albans Town as determined by the most recent United States Census. However, at
no time will a member school district have less than one board member on the Union High School Board. Each member school district will be entitled to one school board member for each one-fifth, or the greater portion thereof,
of said combined population.

Initially there will be three school board members from St. Albans City and two school board members from St. Albans Town serving on the Union High School Board.

10.
School Board Members will be elected for three-year terms except those initially elected at the time of the formation of the Union High School District. In the initial election, there will be one member from
St. Albans City elected for a three-year term and one member from St. Albans Town elected for a three-year term. In the initial election, there will be one member from St. Albans City elected for a two-year term and one
member from St. Albans Town elected for a two-year term. In the initial election, St. Albans City will have one member elected for a term of one year.

11.
The proposal for forming a Union High School District will be presented to the voters of each community on March 2, 2004 at which time school board members will be elected. The Union High School District will
commence educational operations on July 1, 2005 in order to provide a transition time for properly engaging in necessary legal proceedings and to enable the school board to enact policies and other matters necessary for
operating the new Union High School District.

12. a.
On July 1, 2005, following approval by the Franklin Superior Court, the elected School Board members of the Union High School District will assume the duties and responsibilities as Trustees of the Bellows
Free Academy Trust, under the terms and conditions of said “approval ”.

b.
If the Franklin Superior Court does not approve the assumption of duties of the Trustees of Bellows Free Academy by the elected Union High School Board members, then the Bellows Free Academy Trust will continue
to be maintained by the established Board of Trustees for the benefit of the Union High School.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1967
Plainfield and Marshfield each voted yes on the following articles.

Shall the town school district join in the formation of a union school district to consist of the Town School Districts of the Town of Marshfield and the Town of Plainfield, upon the following conditions and agreements:

(a)

Type of School
— The Union School District shall operate a public school offering instruction in grades kindergarten through 12.

(b)

Board of School Directors
— Each member school district shall be entitled to one member of the board of school directors in the Union School District and one additional member for each one hundred (100) students or major fraction
thereof residing in a member district and enrolled in grades kindergarten through twelve of any public school on October 15 of the preceding school year.

(c)

Expenses
— All expenses incurred with respect to the Union School District, including transportation of its students from the member districts, shall be divided among the several member districts in the same proportion
which the student enrollment from each member districts, as above defined, bears to the total student enrollment from all member districts.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1967
Middlesex, Calais, East Montpelier, Montpelier, and Worcester each voted yes on the articles.

1969
The town school district of Berlin requested and was granted admission to the Union District. The town school district of Montpelier requested and was granted permission to withdraw from the union district.

Shall the School District of Middlesex join with the School Districts of Calais, East Montpelier, Montpelier and Worcester to form a Union School District as provided in Chapter 11, Title 16, V.S.A., upon the following conditions and agreements:

(a)

Type of School.
The union high school district shall operate a junior-senior high school offering instruction in grades seven through 12.

(b)

Board of School Directors.
Each member district shall be entitled to one member of the board of school directors of the union high school district for each 100 students or major fraction thereof residing in a member district and enrolled
in grades seven through 12 of any public school at public expense on October 15 of the previous school year. Each member district shall have at least one representative on the union board, in any event.

(c)

Apportionment of Expense.
The expenses incurred by the Union high school district including transportation of its students to and from the member districts shall be divided among the several member districts in the same proportion
which the student enrollment from each district, as above defined bears to the total student enrollment from all member districts.

(d)

Bond Issue.
The board of school directors of the union high school district shall call no meeting to vote upon a bond issue for improvements before the expiration of one year and two months from the date of the organization
meeting.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1988
Vergennes, Panton and Waltham each voted yes to the following article and final report.

ARTICLE 1

Shall the Vergennes Elementary School, Incorporated/Panton School/Waltham School District, which the State Board of Education has found necessary to include in the proposed Union School District, join with the school districts of Panton and Waltham/ Vergennes
Elementary School, Incorporated District, which the State Board of education has found necessary to include in the proposed union school district, for the purpose of forming an Elementary Union School District, as provided
in Title 16, Vermont Statutes Annotated, upon the following conditions and agreements.

(a)

Class of schools.
The Union School District shall operate and manage an elementary school offering instruction in grades Kindergarten through six.

(b)

Board of School Directors
The Elementary School District Board representation shall see proportioned to the population of each member district and shall be one board member for every 1,000 people in a given district based on the most
recent census. The 1980 Census showed the following population: Panton, 537; Vergennes, 2,273; and Waltham, 394. The representation shall be subject to reapportionment following each decennial census. The initial representation
shall be as follows: Vergennes, 3; Panton, 1; and Waltham, 1.

(c)

Apportionment of expenses.
Capital and operating expenses of the Union Elementary School District, including payments under Paragraph 8a of the final report, shall be allocated between member districts on a per student basis, using
the enrollment of legal students who are residents of the member districts as of October 15 of the preceding year. Such capital and operating expenses shall be separately stated in each annual assessment. Enrollment, as
used herein, means legal students who should be attending grades kindergarten through six at public expense.

(d)

Assumption of debts and ownership of school property.
The Union School District shall assume the indebtedness of member districts, acquire the school properties of member districts, and pay for them, all as specified in the final report. In order to facilitate
the formation of the union school district, the voters of Vergennes shall authorize the Vergennes Prudential Committee to permit the purchase of the Vergennes Elementary School by the Union School of the Vergennes Elementary
School by the Union School District for the amount of $1,694,400.00, plus $151,250.00 which is Vergennes’ equity in the new addition, and to extend equity credit to Panton and Waltham school districts as set forth in the
final report with the result that the share of the Town of Waltham School District shall be all equity credit, and the share of the Town of Panton School District shall be equity credit plus approximately $110,000.00 to
be paid without interest, approximately $15,000.00 per year for the first two years, and approximately $10,000.00 per year for the eight years thereafter. The exact figures shall be computed as set forth in the final report.

(e)

Final Report.
The provisions of the final report approved by the State Board of Education on the 15th day of August, 1988, which is on file in both the city Clerk’s office and School District Clerk’s office, shall govern
the Union District.

Final Report

1.
The School Districts necessary to establish the Union Elementary School District are Vergennes, Panton and Waltham. This would include all of the Panton students now attending the Addison School.

2.
No additional districts are considered advisable, due to the size of the proposed facility.

3.
The Union Elementary School District will continue to operate at the same level as the present Vergennes Elementary School, Kindergarten through 6.

4.
No new schools are to be constructed.

5. a.
At first, transportation could continue to be handled by each community. Studies will be initiated to determine whether transportation could be handled through a more economical, larger district organization.

b.
The teaching staff will be basically the Vergennes Elementary School staff plus additional staff as needed. The teaching staff will continue to be employed under contract with the Addison Northwest District.

c.
The curriculum, as presently offered by the Vergennes Elementary School, will be expanded to meet the needs of new educational programs.

d.
The Union shall be responsible for all required special education students residing in the member districts.

6.
The Union Elementary School District shall assume all the rights and liabilities of the Vergennes Prudential Committee relating to the Vergennes Elementary School building except the bonded indebtedness for
the 1987 addition.

7.
The Union Elementary School District will acquire the Vergennes Elementary School, including the new, 1987 addition. As of June 30, 1989, the financial status of the Vergennes Elementary School is expected
to be as shown below:

Pre 1987 Elementary School

Appraised value $1,694,400, no Capital Debt

1987 Addition to Elementary School

Total bonded indebtedness

$820,000

Amount retired by 6/30/89

$151,250

Net indebtedness, 6/30/89 $668,750

*Estimated

The debt-free part of the Vergennes Elementary School, pre 1987 addition, will be purchased by the Union Elementary School District from the Vergennes Prudential Committee for cash. Each member district will pay a share of the cost, based on their projected
student attendance in the Union School, projected as of June, 1989. This will be a paper transaction of 51,634,400, based on the Benton appraisal. The following example shows a set of figures based on June, 1988 best estimates.

(a)
A payment of $1,694,400 to the Prudential Committee of Vergennes, from the Union Elementary School District.

(b)
A payment from the Prudential Committee of Vergennes, to the Union Elementary School District of $1,694,400. This will be shown as Union buy-in costs, divided as shown, and based on June, 1988 best estimates,
would be as follows.

1,172,524.3 or 69.2 % from Vergennes

136,384 or 11 % from Waltham

335,491.2 or 19.8 % from Panton

1,694,400.0 TOTAL

The Waltham share will be equity credit, based on the pre 1987 Waltham student attendance of 11.1% at the Vergennes Elementary School. This shall not exceed their buy-in cost to enter the Union.

The Panton share will be made up of $233,657.76 in equity credit, based on pre 1987 Panton student attendance of 13.79%, at Vergennes, and a $101,833.44 loan to Panton from the Prudential Committee of Vergennes. This loan to be repaid over a ten-year
period with no interest.

The Union Elementary School District will also pay the Vergennes Prudential Committee $151,250 to cover the retired part of the bonded indebtedness of the 1987 addition. This will be a paper transaction of $151,250. The following example shows a set of
figures based on June, 1988 best estimates.

(c)
A payment of $151,250 from the Union Elementary School District to the Vergennes Prudential Committee.

(d)
A payment from the Vergennes Prudential Committee to the Union Elementary School District of $151,250. This will be shown as Union buy-in costs, divided as shown, and based on June, 1988 best estimates, would
be as follows:

104,655 or 69.2 % from Vergennes

16,637.5 or 11 % from Waltham

29,947.5 or 19.8 % from Panton

151,250 TOTAL

The Waltham share will be equity credit based on the Waltham student attendance of 11% at Vergennes during the period that part of the 1987 addition debt was retired. The attendance figures will be finalized in June, 1989.

The Panton share will be made up of $20,872.50 in equity credit, based on Panton student attendance of 13.8% at Vergennes during the period that part of the debt on the 1987 addition was retired, and a $9,075 loan to Panton from the Prudential Committee
of Vergennes. The attendance figures will be finalized in June, 1989. This loan to be repaid over a two-year period with no interest.

The pre-1987 Vergennes Elementary School attendance figures are 5 year averages. The projected 1987 to 1989 and Union attendance figures are June, 1988, best estimates. Firm figures, very close to those quoted, will be available in June, 1989 for use
in the final financial transactions.

The Vergennes Prudential committee shall convey the Vergennes Elementary School including the 1987 addition, its contents and 14 acres of grounds to the Union Elementary School District. The 14 acres of grounds are described on a plat filed in the Vergennes
City Hall. interest in these premises shall be transferred by deed, creating a fee interest which is subject to condition upon the first to occur of the dissolution of the Union Elementary School District, or the failure
of the Union Elementary School District to make payments required under Paragraph 8. At that time the Vergennes Prudential Committee shall have the right to enter and reclaim the premises, without any action in the nature
of a foreclosure or otherwise. In the event that the Union Elementary School District is dissolved, the Vergennes Prudential Committee shall pay to the towns of Panton and Waltham, amounts equal to their contributions to
the Union Elementary School District Capital payment under Paragraph 8. No interest shall be included in the payment. In the event that the Union Elementary School District is dissolved, any outstanding loans from the Vergennes
Prudential Committee will be considered due and payable.

8.
Capital and operating expenses of the Union Elementary School District, including payments under Paragraph 8a, shall be allocated between member districts on a per pupil basis, using the enrollment of legal
students who are residents of the member districts as of October 15 of the preceding year. such capital and operating shall be separately stated in each annual assessment. “Enrollment”, for purposes of this Agreement, means
legal students who should be attending grades kindergarten through public expense.

In order to pay existing debt obligations, indebtedness defined in Paragraph 7, the Union Elementary School District shall make capital payments to the Vergennes Prudential Committee on or before November 1 of each year from 1990 through 2006 in an amount
equal to the obligation of the Vergennes Prudential Committee due to its bondholders on the following December 1 under its 1986 series bonds issued through the Vermont Municipal Bond Bank. The Vergennes Prudential Committee
shall retain its existing obligations under these bonds.

If the Union Elementary School District should sell or otherwise dispose of the elementary school, payments will be made to the Vergennes Prudential Committee, Panton School District and Waltham School District, after first paying to the Vergennes Prudential
Committee an amount equal to any remaining principal on its 1986 series bonds issued by the Vermont Municipal Bond Bank. The amount distributed to the Vergennes Prudential Committee shall be $1,694.40, the 1987 appraised
value of the original elementary school — with equity credit to Panton and Waltham rescinded, plus capital payments made to the Union District under this Agreement. Payments to Panton and Waltham will include only capital
payments made to the Union District. Upon that sale or disposition, the reversionary interest of the Vergennes Prudential Committee shall be extinguished.

9.
The Elementary School District Board representation shall be proportioned to the population of each member district. One Board member for every 1000 people in a given district based on the most recent
census. The 1980 Census showed the following population: Panton — 537, Vergennes — 2,273 and Waltham — 394. The representation shall be subject to reapportionment following each decennial census. The initial representation
shall be as follows:

Vergennes — 3 members; Panton — 1 member; Waltham — 1 member. Annually, one member shall be elected Chair by the Board and shall be a non-voting member, except when necessary to break a tie.

10.
The terms of office of the Union Elementary School District Board members shall be as follows:

The City of Vergennes will have 3 board members who will serve three year terms upon the establishment of the following schedule.

The Towns of Panton and Waltham shall each have 1 Board member who will serve three year terms upon the establishment of the following schedule:

1988 1 Vergennes (1 yr. Term)

1 Panton 1 Vergennes (2 yr. Term)

1 Waltham 1 Vergennes (3 yr. Term)

1989 0 Panton 0 Waltham 1 Vergennes (3 yr. Term)

1990 1 Panton 0 Waltham 1 Vergennes (3 yr. Term)

1991 0 Panton 1 Waltham 1 Vergennes (3 yr. Term)

11.
The Union Elementary School District proposal shall be submitted to the voters of the City of Vergennes and the Towns of Waltham and Panton on November 8, 1988.

12.
The Union Elementary School District shall be named by the Union Board following suggestions from the students after approval of the Union Elementary School District.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1956
Ferrisburg, Waltham, Vergennes each voted yes on the articles below. Addison, Panton also voted yes except that they voted not to send their 7th and 8th grade students to the Union District School.
Ferrisburg later rescinded its vote with reference to sending its 7th and 8th grade students.

1968
Addison requested and was granted permission to send its grades 7 and 8 to the Union District school.

Article 1: To consolidate with one or more neighboring school districts for the purpose of forming a Union High School District pursuant to the authority contained in No. 202 of the Acts of 1953 as amended, said Union High School District to be organized
and operated in accordance with the provisions of said act except as modified by the following agreements entered into by the school districts forming said Union High School District:

(a)
TYPE OF HIGH SCHOOL: Said Union High School District shall operate as a high school, junior-senior high school having six years courses consisting of grades 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12.

(b)
LOCATION: Said junior-senior high school shall be located within the territorial limits of the City of Vergennes.

(c)
TRANSPORTATION EXPENSE: The expense of transportation of pupils to said junior-senior high school shall be divided among the member districts of said Union High School District in proportion to the
student enrollment, as hereinafter defined, in said junior-senior high school from each member district.

(d)
STUDENT ENROLLMENT: Student enrollment shall include all students residing in a member district and enrolled for the whole or a part of given school year in grades 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 in said
junior senior high school and/or enrolled for all or part of such year in said grades in any other school within said district or elsewhere, except that students attending the 7th and 8th grades of a parochial or
private school shall not be included, nor shall there be included students attending the 7th and 8th grades in those member districts which before the formation of said Union High School District have voted not
to send their 7th and 8th grade students to said junior-senior high school.

(e)
OPTION FOR 7th AND 8th GRADE STUDENTS: Member districts may before the formation of said Union High School District vote not to send their 7th and 8th grade pupils to said junior-senior high school.

(f)
APPORTIONMENT OF EXPENSES: All expenses, including transportation, building, maintaining and operating said Union High School District shall be divided among the member districts in the proportion
which the student enrollment as above defined, in each member district for the previous school year bears to the total number of student enrollment, as above defined, for said year in all the districts in said Union
High School District.

(g)
BOARD OF SCHOOL DIRECTORS: The school board of said Union High School District shall consist of directors to be elected by the member districts at their respective annual meetings. At the formation
of the district, the representation shall be as follows: Addison, one; Panton, one; Waltham, one; Ferrisburg, two; Vergennes, two. This apportionment is set up with the stipulation that later changes deemed necessary
be made at the discretion of the district directors and voted upon by the union district. Temporary School Directors to serve for the period of time from the formation of said Union High School District up to the
first annual meeting of said Union High School District shall be elected from the respective member districts at their own special meetings.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1970
Topsham and Corinth voted yes on the following:

ARTICLE 1:
Shall the Town School District of Topsham/Corinth which the State Board of Education has found necessary to include in the proposed Union School District, join with the School District of Corinth/Topsham,
which the State Board of Education has found necessary to include in the proposed Union School District for the purpose of forming a Union School District as provided in Title 16, Vermont Statutes Annotated, upon
the following conditions and agreements:

(a)

Class of schools.
The Union School District shall be a kindergarten through grade twelve Union District. The Union School District shall operate and manage a kindergarten through grade eight school if the voters in
each town approve a bond issue of sufficient size to cover the cost of construction of such a school. Otherwise the Union School District would operate a kindergarten through grade six school in such new building
as the voters in each town might authorize.

(b)

Board of School Directors.
One School Director shall be elected from each town with an additional School Director elected from each town for every one hundred pupils or fractional part thereof determined as of October 1st
each year.

(c)

Apportionment of Expenses.
Each Town School District shall share in the capital and operating expenses of the Union as nearly as possible in that proportion which the average daily membership of the Town School District bears
to the total average daily memberships of all town districts included in the Union. The calculation will be determined according to the average daily membership as of October 1st of each operating year.

(d)

Assumption of Debts and Ownership of School Property.
The Union School District shall not assume any existing indebtedness of either Town School District. Existing school buildings shall not be acquired by the Union School District. The Corinth Town
School District shall pay the Topsham Town School District its proportionate share of the cost of the school site previously purchased by the Topsham Town School District from Eugene D. Eastman and wife according
to the cost sharing formula set forth above with the average daily membership figured as of October 1, 1969 for the purpose of determining the proportionate share of each town district.

(e)

Final Report.
The provisions of the final report approved by the State Board of Education on the 24th day of February, 1970, which is on file in the Town Clerk’s Office in the Towns of Topsham and Corinth, shall
govern the Union District.

Final Report

The agreement recommended by the Planning Committee includes the following:

1.
That the Towns of Corinth and Topsham are necessary for the establishment of the proposed unions.

2.
That no additional school districts were considered by the Committee to be included in the proposed Union.

3.
That a K-12 Union School District be voted. Furthermore, that the Union School District would operate a K-8 school if the voters in each town approved a bond issue sufficient to cover the cost. Otherwise
the Union School District would operate a K-6 school in a new building which will be voted on a future date. In the event only a K-6 school building is authorized by the voters, pupils in Grades 7 through 12 will
be educated in neighboring communities on a tuition basis.

4.
That the cost of any new school building would be determined by the class of school voted by the citizens in each town, be it K through 6 or K through 8.

Any new school authorized by the voters will be located on a site previously purchased by the Town of Topsham for this purpose.

5.
That the Union School District will enter into contractual arrangements with private transportation companies to provide transportation for the children attending the class of schools approved by
the Board.

That the Planning Committee recommends maintaining a teacher-pupil ratio of one to twenty-three and, furthermore, that the necessary supporting staff members be included to provide instruction in music, art, physical education, and elementary guidance.

The Planning Committee’s curriculum report is attached.

6.
That the Union District Board of Education not assume any existing debt in either town. At this time no bonded indebtedness exists in either town school District.

7.
That the existing school buildings (two in Corinth and three in Topsham) would not be acquired by the Union District Board.

That the Town of Corinth would pay the Town of Topsham its proportionate share of the cost of the school site previously alluded to in point No. 4 according to the cost sharing formula recommended by the committee in point No. 8 below. The Average Daily
Membership figure of October 1, 1969 would determine the proportionate cost per town.

8.
That each school District shall share in the capital and operating expenses of the union as nearly as possible in that proportion which the A.D.M. of the District bears to the total A.D.M. of each
town in the Union. The calculation will be determined according to the A.D.M. figure of October 1 of each operating year.

9.
That the method of proportioning school Director representation which each proposed member district shall have on the Union School Board will be as follows:

One school Director shall be elected from each town for a total of two. One additional school Director shall be elected from each town for every 100 pupils or fractional part thereof. This formula provides for an initial Union School Board of six members,
three from each town.

10.
The term of Office of Directors initially elected shall be arranged so that one-third expire on July first following the second annual meeting, one-third on July first following the third annual
meeting and one-third on July first following the fourth annual meeting, or as near to that proportion as possible.

11.
That the Union proposal will be submitted to the voters in each town as soon as possible and in conformance with the Statutes.

CORINTH-TOPSHAM CURRICULUM COMMITTEE REPORT